Indiana, session 2026, HB1048.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-8-12-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A unit served by
a volunteer fire department shall pay directly to each active and
participating member of the department: Unless otherwise provided
by contract, a unit served by a volunteer fire department shall pay to
each active and participating member of the department:
(1) a clothing allowance of not less than one hundred dollars
($100) two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per year; and
(2) an automobile allowance of not less than one hundred dollars
($100) two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per year for the use of
the member's automobile in the line of duty.
(b) A contract may also provide that fees for membership in a
regularly organized volunteer firefighters' association be paid by the
unit on behalf of the firefighters in the volunteer fire department.
HEA 1048 — Concur

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1048 — Concur